Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.205

Degrees through master's degrees—Honorary degrees.

(1) In addition to all other powers and duties given to them by law, Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University, and Western Washington University are hereby authorized to grant any degree through the master's degree to any student who has completed a program of study and/or research in those areas which are determined by the faculty and board of trustees of the college to be appropriate for the granting of such degree.

(2) The board of trustees, upon recommendation of the faculty, may also confer honorary bachelor's, master's, or doctorate level degrees upon persons in recognition of their learning or devotion to education, literature, art, or science. No degree may be conferred in consideration of the payment of money or the donation of any kind of property.

(3) The board of trustees may also confer honorary degrees upon persons who request an honorary degree if they were students at the university in 1942 and did not graduate because they were ordered into an internment camp. The honorary degree may also be requested by a representative of deceased persons who meet these requirements. For the purposes of this subsection, "internment camp" means a relocation center to which persons were ordered evacuated by Presidential Executive Order 9066, signed February 19, 1942.

[ 2012 c 229 s 811; 2010 c 51 s 3; 2009 c 295 s 1; 1991 c 58 s 2; 1985 c 370 s 84; 1979 c 14 s 4. Prior: 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 51. Cf: 1975 1st ex.s. c 232 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.